Maryland, session 2025, HB1444.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
1–1308.
(A) [To] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, TO support, foster,
or promote an affordable housing program for individuals or families of low or moderate
income, a county or municipality may:
(1) establish local trust funds or appropriate funds;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1444*

HOUSE BILL 1444
(2) waive or modify building permit or development impact fees and
charges that are not mandated under State law for the construction or rehabilitation of
lower income housing units:
(i) in proportion to the number of lower income housing units of a
development; and
(ii) 1. that are financed, wholly or partly, by public funding that
requires mortgage restrictions or recorded covenants restricting the rental or sale of the
housing units to lower income residents in accordance with specific government program
requirements; or
2. that are developed by a nonprofit organization that:
A. has been exempt from federal taxation under § 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code for at least 3 years; and
B. requires the homebuyer to participate in the construction
or rehabilitation of the housing unit;
(3) enact legislation that restricts cost and resale prices and requires
development of affordable housing units as part of any subdivision in return for added
density;
(4) provide land or property from the inventory of the county or
municipality; and
(5) support PILOT (payment in lieu of taxes) programs to encourage
construction of affordable housing.
(B) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT AUTHORIZE PAYMENT OF A
FEE–IN–LIEU OF A REQUIREMENT UNDER LOCAL LAW THAT A DEVELOPER PROVIDE
MODERATE INCOME HOUSING UNITS IN A NEW RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT
PROJECT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any authorized payment of a fee–in–lieu by a developer to a county or
municipality before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.